Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1048.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-16 of the General Laws entitled "Teachers’ Retirement [See Title
16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding thereto
the following section:
16-16-24.3. Substitute teaching and post-retirement teachers.
(a) Notwithstanding any public or general law, or rule or regulation to the contrary, and
except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, any teacher member who has retired under the
provisions of Title 16 (“education”) may exceed the ninety-day (90) cap on post-retirement
employment and work up to one hundred eighty (180) days during a school year upon:
(1) A determination by the local education authority (“LEA”) that there exists a specialized
need, within the authority, to fill positions on a temporary basis, that may require the LEA to
employ retired teachers and exceed the ninety-day (90) cap on post-retirement employment;
(2) Retired teacher members being asked to exceed the ninety-day (90) cap on post-
retirement employment possess the skills, training, and knowledge necessary to help address
teacher staffing shortages; and
(3) The local education authority has notified the state retirement board that it has
determined that exceeding the ninety-day (90) cap on post-retirement employment is necessary to
help address teacher staffing shortages. Provided, however:
(i) No employment may be offered to a retiree subject to this section unless the employer
has made a good-faith effort each school year to fill the position with a nonretired employee without

success, and certifies, in writing, that it has done so to the employees’ retirement system and to the
bargaining agents of all education unions with whom the employer has collective bargaining
agreements;
(ii) The LEA provides in its notice to the state retirement board and the bargaining agents
the total number of certified teacher positions within the LEA, including the number of teacher
positions filled and the number of teacher positions the LEA is seeking to fill; and
(iii) The total number of retired teachers an LEA may hire under the provisions of this
section may not exceed five percent (5%) of the total number of certified teacher positions reported
to the state retirement board by the LEA pursuant to subsection (a)(3)(ii) of this section.
(b) Any teacher member who has retired under the provisions of title 16, and has been
employed or re-employed under the provisions of this section, shall not be entitled to additional
service credits for such employment, and the teacher member shall not be responsible for any
contribution to the pension system as a result of the employment; provided, however, the local
educational authority shall make the employer contribution for the teacher member as if the district
had hired a new teacher member.
(c) A teacher retired under the provisions of title 16 shall be subject to a ninety-day (90)
cap on post-retirement employment during the period of one year after the date of that teacher’s
retirement. Thereafter, that teacher shall be eligible to exceed the ninety-day (90) day cap on post-
retirement as provided in subsection (a) of this section.
(d) The provisions of this section shall apply retroactively to June 20, 2025, and shall sunset
one year from enactment or on August 1, 2026, whichever shall occur first.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall be retroactive to June 20,
2025.
========
LC002855
========
LC002855 - Page 2 of 3